Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-158
Loup.

The county of Loup is bounded as follows: Commencing at the northeast corner of township twenty-four, north, of range seventeen, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty-four, north, of range twenty, west; thence south to the southwest corner of township twenty-one, north, of range twenty, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township twenty-one, north, of range seventeen, west; thence north to the place of beginning.

Laws 1883, c. 35, § 1, p. 202;

R.S.1913, § 871;

C.S.1922, § 773;

C.S.1929, § 25-160;

R.S.1943, § 22-158.